API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 231 Y 374
SFX 231 0 කරනවා .
SFX 231 0 කරමි .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කරමු .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කරහි .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කරහු .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නේය .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නීය .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නාය .
SFX 231 0 කරති .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නෝය .
SFX 231 0 කරන්න .
SFX 231 0 කරව .
SFX 231 0 කරනු .
SFX 231 0 කරපිය .
SFX 231 0 කරාපිය .
SFX 231 0 කරපන් .
SFX 231 0 කරාපන් .
SFX 231 0 කරව් .
SFX 231 0 කරපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කරාපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කරපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කරාපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කරනවාලා .
SFX 231 0 කරයිලු .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නේලු .
SFX 231 0 කරතිලු .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කරද්දෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කරාපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කරපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරාපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරාවි .
SFX 231 0 කරේවි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නීය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙති .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්න .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙනු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙපිය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොපිය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙපන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොපන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙනවාලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙයිලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙතිලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරොවි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරේවි .
SFX 231 0 කරනවා .
SFX 231 0 කරවමි .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කරවමු .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කරවහි .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කරවහු .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නේය .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නීය .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නාය .
SFX 231 0 කරවති .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නෝය .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්න .
SFX 231 0 කරවව .
SFX 231 0 කරවනු .
SFX 231 0 කරවපිය .
SFX 231 0 කරවාපිය .
SFX 231 0 කරවපන් .
SFX 231 0 කරවාපන් .
SFX 231 0 කරවව් .
SFX 231 0 කරවපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කරවාපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කරවපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කරවාපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කරවනවාලා .
SFX 231 0 කරවයිලු .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නේලු .
SFX 231 0 කරවතිලු .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කරවද්දෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරවපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කරවාපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කරවපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරවාපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරවාවි .
SFX 231 0 කරවේවි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවනවා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නීය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවති .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්න .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවව .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවනු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවපිය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාපිය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවපන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාපන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවව් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාපියව් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාපල්ලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවනවාලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවයිලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවතිලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවන්නෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවද්දෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාපුවාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාපුදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවාවි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවේවි .
SFX 231 0 කරා  .
SFX 231 0 කරෙමි  .
SFX 231 0 කරෙමු  . 
SFX 231 0 කරෙහි  .
SFX 231 0 කරෙහු  . 
SFX 231 0 කරේය  .
SFX 231 0 කරාය  .
SFX 231 0 කරහ  .
SFX 231 0 කරෝය  .
SFX 231 0 කරාලු  .
SFX 231 0 කරේලු  .
SFX 231 0 කරහලු  .
SFX 231 0 කරෝලු  .
SFX 231 0 කරාවේ  .
SFX 231 0 කරදෙන්  .
SFX 231 0 කරාදෙන්  .
SFX 231 0 කරපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවා  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවෙමි  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවෙමු  . 
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවෙහි  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවෙහු  . 
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවේය  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවාය  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවහ  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවෝය  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවාලු  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවේලු  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවහලු  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවෝලු  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවාවේ  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවදෙන්  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවාදෙන්  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවිණ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවිණි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවීය . 
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවියහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණාලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණහලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවින .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවිනි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනාලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනහලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුනදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරිණ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරිණි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරීය . 
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරියහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණාලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණහලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරින .
SFX 231 0 කෙරිනි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනාලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනහලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුනදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කරන .
SFX 231 0 කරනා .
SFX 231 0 කරවන .
SFX 231 0 කරවනා .
SFX 231 0 කරවපු .
SFX 231 0 කරවා .
SFX 231 0 කරවලා .
SFX 231 0 කරම .
SFX 231 0 කරවම .
SFX 231 0 කරත්ම .
SFX 231 0 කරවත්ම .
SFX 231 0 කරන්න .
SFX 231 0 කරන්නට .
SFX 231 0 කරන්ට .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්න .
SFX 231 0 කරවන්නට .
SFX 231 0 කරද්දී .
SFX 231 0 කරත්දී .
SFX 231 0 කරවද්දී .
SFX 231 0 කරවත්දී .
SFX 231 0 කරතොත් .
SFX 231 0 කරවතොත් .
SFX 231 0 කරතත් .
SFX 231 0 කරවතත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වෙමි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වෙමු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වෙහි .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වෙහු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වේය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වාය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්හ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වහ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වෝය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වාලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වේලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්හලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වහලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වෝලු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වාවේ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වදෙන් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙනා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙන .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙනා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරූ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරිච්ච .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවූ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්ව .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණු .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙව්ව .
SFX 231 0 කෙරී .
SFX 231 0 කෙරිලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවී .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවිලා .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙමින් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙමින් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙත්ම .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙත්ම .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්න .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්ට .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙන්නට .
SFX 231 0 කෙරීමට .	
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙන්න  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙන්ට  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙන්නට  .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවීමට .	
SFX 231 0 කෙරිය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවිය .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙද්දී .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙත්දී .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙද්දී .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙත්දී .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවොත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවොතින් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙතොත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණොත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණොතින් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වොත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙතොත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණොත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණොතින් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුවත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙතත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුණත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරෙව්වත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවෙතත් .
SFX 231 0 කෙරවුණත් .
SFX 231 0 කළා  .
SFX 231 0 කළෙමි  .
SFX 231 0 කළෙමු  . 
SFX 231 0 කළෙහි  .
SFX 231 0 කළෙහු  . 
SFX 231 0 කළේය  .
SFX 231 0 කළාය  .
SFX 231 0 කළහ  .
SFX 231 0 කළෝය  .
SFX 231 0 කළාලු  .
SFX 231 0 කළේලු  .
SFX 231 0 කළහලු  .
SFX 231 0 කළෝලු  .
SFX 231 0 කළාවේ  .
SFX 231 0 කළදෙන්  .
SFX 231 0 කළාදෙන්  .
SFX 231 0 කළපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 231 0 කළ .
SFX 231 0 කෙරුව .
SFX 231 0 කරපු .
SFX 231 0 කරලා .
SFX 231 0 කරවිය .
