API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
අඩුක්/231
අය/231
අස්/231
කැප/231
ක්‍රියා/231
ගුණ/231
දඟ/231
පත්/231
පරක්/231
පසු/231
පළ/231,240
පා/231
බෝ/231
මුහු/231
යා/231
යොමු/231
රැස්/231
ලක්/231
ලහි/231
වක්/231
වත්/231
වාන්දු/231
වැඩ/231
සවි/231
සිදු/231
සීමා/231
සුං/231
ළං/231
